Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6109.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 53. (1) To obtain the printing of the name of a person an individual as a candidate for nomination by a political party for the office of governor under a particular political party heading upon on the official primary ballots, there shall must be filed with the secretary of state nominating petitions signed by a number of qualified and registered electors residing in this state as determined under section 544f. Nominating petitions shall must be signed by at least 100 registered resident electors in each of at least 1/2 of the congressional districts of the this state. Nominating petitions shall must be in the form as prescribed in section 544c. Until December 31, 2013, nominating petitions shall be received by the secretary of state for filing in accordance with this act up to 4 p.m. of the twelfth Tuesday before the August primary. Beginning January 1, 2014, nominating Nominating petitions shall must be received by the secretary of state for filing in accordance with this act up to 4 p.m. of the fifteenth Tuesday before the August primary. (2) In lieu of filing nominating petitions, a candidate for the office of governor may pay a nonrefundable filing fee of $15,000.00 to the secretary of state. Payment of the filing fee and certification of the name of the candidate paying the filing fee are governed by the same provisions as in the case of nominating petitions. The filing fee must be deposited in the general fund of this state. Sec. 54. After the filing of a nominating petition petitions or the payment of a filing fee by or in on behalf of a proposed candidate for governor, such the candidate shall is not be permitted to withdraw unless a written notice of withdrawal is served on the secretary of state or his duly the secretary of state's authorized agent not later than 4 p.m. , eastern standard time, of the third day after the last day for the filing such of nominating petitions or the payment of a filing fee. Sec. 58. When If a candidate of any political party for the office of governor has filed a files nominating petition petitions or pays a filing fee for such the office and has been nominated for said the office by said a political party, he shall that candidate is not be permitted to withdraw unless he has removed the candidate moves from the this state , or has become becomes physically unfit. This prohibition shall does not be construed to prohibit the withdrawal of any candidate who has been is nominated without having filed a nominating petition petitions or paid a filing fee and whose name has been is written or placed on the ballot of any political party. Sec. 93. (1) In order for the name of a person an individual as a candidate for nomination by a political party for the office of United States senator Senator to appear under a particular political party heading on the official primary ballot, a nominating petition shall petitions must be filed with the secretary of state. The nominating petition shall have been petitions must be signed by a number of qualified and registered electors residing within in this state as determined under section 544f. The nominating petition shall petitions must be signed by at least 100 qualified and registered electors in each of at least 1/2 of the congressional districts of this state. Nominating petitions shall must be in the form as prescribed in section 544c. Until December 31, 2013, the nominating petition shall be filed with the secretary of state no later than 4 p.m. of the twelfth Tuesday before the August primary. Beginning January 1, 2014, the The nominating petition shall petitions must be filed with the secretary of state no later than 4 p.m. of the fifteenth Tuesday before the August primary. (2) In lieu of filing nominating petitions, a candidate for the office of United States Senator may pay a nonrefundable filing fee of $15,000.00 to the secretary of state. Payment of the filing fee and certification of the name of the candidate paying the filing fee are governed by the same provisions as in the case of nominating petitions. The filing fee must be deposited in the general fund of this state. Sec. 94. After the filing of a nominating petition petitions or the payment of a filing fee by or in on behalf of a proposed candidate for United States senator, such Senator, the candidate shall is not be permitted to withdraw unless a written notice of withdrawal is served on the secretary of state or his duly the secretary of state's authorized agent not later than 4 o'clock, eastern standard time, in the afternoon p.m. of the third day after the last day for the filing such of nominating petitions or the payment of a filing fee. Sec. 98. When If a candidate of any political party has filed a files nominating petition petitions or pays a filing fee for such office United States Senator and has been is nominated for said the office by said a political party, he shall that candidate is not be permitted to withdraw unless he has removed the candidate moves from the this state , or has become becomes physically unfit. No A vacancy shall must not be filled by the state central committees except for the causes and as herein specified : Provided, That this in this section. However, this prohibition shall does not be construed to prohibit the withdrawal of any candidate who has been is nominated without having filed a nominating petition petitions or paid a filing fee and whose name has been is written or placed on the ballot of any political party. Sec. 133. (1) In order for the name of a person an individual as a candidate for nomination by a political party for the office of representative Representative in congress Congress to appear under a particular political party heading on the official primary ballot in the election precincts of a congressional district, a nominating petition shall have been petitions must be signed by a number of qualified and registered electors residing in the district as determined under section 544f. Until December 31, 2013, if the congressional district comprises more than 1 county, the nominating petition shall be filed with the secretary of state no later than 4 p.m. of the twelfth Tuesday before the August primary. Beginning January 1, 2014, if If the congressional district comprises more than 1 county, the nominating petition shall petitions must be filed with the secretary of state no later than 4 p.m. of the fifteenth Tuesday before the August primary. Until December 31, 2013, if the congressional district is within 1 county, the nominating petition shall be filed with the county clerk of that county no later than 4 p.m. of the twelfth Tuesday before the August primary. Beginning January 1, 2014, if If the congressional district is within 1 county, the nominating petition shall petitions must be filed with the county clerk of that county no later than 4 p.m. of the fifteenth Tuesday before the August primary. Nominating petitions shall must be in the form as prescribed in section 544c. (2) If the congressional district comprises more than 1 county, in lieu of filing nominating petitions, a candidate for the office of Representative in Congress may pay a nonrefundable filing fee of $1,000.00 to the secretary of state. If the congressional district is within 1 county, in lieu of filing nominating petitions, a candidate for the office of Representative in Congress may pay a nonrefundable filing fee of $1,000.00 to the county clerk of that county. Payment of the filing fee and certification of the name of the candidate paying the filing fee are governed by the same provisions as in the case of nominating petitions. The filing fee paid to the secretary of state must be deposited in the general fund of this state, and the filing fee paid to a county clerk must be deposited in the general fund of that county. Sec. 134. After the filing of a nominating petition petitions or the payment of a filing fee by or in on behalf of a proposed candidate for representative Representative in congress, such Congress, the candidate shall is not be permitted to withdraw unless a written notice of withdrawal is served on the official with whom the petition was nominating petitions were filed or the filing fee was paid, or his duly the official's authorized agent, not later than 4 o'clock, eastern standard time, in the afternoon p.m. of the third day after the last day for the filing such of nominating petitions or the payment of a filing fee. Sec. 138. When If a candidate of any political party has filed a files nominating petition petitions or pays a filing fee for such office Representative in Congress and has been is nominated for said the office by said a political party, he shall that candidate is not be permitted to withdraw unless he has removed the candidate moves from the this state or has become becomes physically unfit. ; no A vacancy shall must not be filled by the district or county committees except for the causes and as herein specified : Provided, That this in this section. However, this prohibition shall does not be construed to prohibit the withdrawal of any candidate who has been is nominated without having filed a nominating petition petitions or paid a filing fee and whose name has been is written or placed on the ballot of any political party. Sec. 409a. A general nonpartisan primary election shall must be held in every appellate court district of this state on the Tuesday succeeding after the first Monday in August preceding before every general November election in which judges of the court of appeals are to be elected, at which time the qualified and registered electors may vote for nonpartisan candidates for the office of judge of the court of appeals. : Provided, however, That if, If, upon expiration of the time for filing nominating petitions or paying a filing fee for the primary election of said the judge of the court of appeals in any appellate court district, it shall appear appears that there are not to exceed twice the number of candidates as there are persons individuals to be elected, then the secretary of state shall certify to the county board or boards of election commissioners the names of such the candidates for court of appeals judge whose nominating petitions, filing fee fees, or affidavit affidavits of candidacy have been properly filed or paid, and such those candidates shall be are the nominees for judge of the court of appeals and shall must be so certified. As to such that office, there shall must not be no a primary election and this office shall must be omitted from the judicial primary ballot. Sec. 409b. (1) To obtain the printing of the name of a qualified person individual other than an incumbent judge of the court of appeals as a candidate for nomination for the office of judge of the court of appeals upon on the official nonpartisan primary ballots, there must be filed with the secretary of state nominating petitions containing the signatures, addresses, and dates of signing of a number of qualified and registered electors residing in the appellate court district as determined under section 544f. The provisions of sections 544a and 544b apply. The secretary of state shall receive nominating petitions up to 4 p.m. on the fifteenth Tuesday before the primary. In lieu of filing nominating petitions, a candidate for the office of judge of the court of appeals may pay a nonrefundable filing fee to the secretary of state in a dollar amount equal to the minimum number of nominating petition signatures required for this office. Payment of the filing fee and certification of the name of the candidate paying the filing fee are governed by the same provisions as in the case of nominating petitions. The filing fee must be deposited in the general fund of this state. (2) Nominating petitions filed or filing fees paid under this section are valid only if they the candidate clearly indicate indicates for which of the following offices the candidate is filing, consistent with subsection (8): (a) An unspecified existing judgeship for which the incumbent judge is seeking election. (b) An unspecified existing judgeship for which the incumbent judge is not seeking election. (c) A new judgeship. (3) Nominating petitions specifying a new or existing court of appeals judgeship may not be used to qualify a candidate for another judicial office of the same court in the same judicial district. A person An individual who files nominating petitions or pays a filing fee for election to more than 1 court of appeals judgeship has not more than 3 days following after the close of filing to withdraw from all but 1 filing. (4) In a primary and general election for 2 or more judgeships where more than 1 of the categories in subsection (2) could be selected, a candidate shall apply to the bureau of elections for a written statement of office designation to correspond to the judgeship sought by the candidate. The office designation provided by the secretary of state must be included in the heading of all nominating petitions. Nominating petitions containing an improper office designation are invalid. (5) The secretary of state shall issue an office designation of incumbent position for any judgeship for which the incumbent judge is eligible to seek reelection. If an incumbent judge does not file an affidavit of candidacy by the deadline, the secretary of state shall notify all candidates for that office that a nonincumbent position exists. All nominating petitions circulated for the nonincumbent position subsequent to the deadline must bear an office designation of nonincumbent position. All signatures collected before the affidavit of candidacy filing deadline may be filed with the nonincumbent nominating petitions. (6) An incumbent judge of the court of appeals may become a candidate in the primary election for the office of which he or she the individual is the incumbent by filing with the secretary of state an affidavit of candidacy not less than 134 days before the date of the primary election. However, if an incumbent judge of the court of appeals was appointed to fill a vacancy and the judge entered upon the duties of the office less than 137 days before the date of the primary election but before the fifteenth Tuesday before the primary election, the incumbent judge may file the affidavit of candidacy not more than 3 days after entering upon the duties of office. The affidavit of candidacy must contain statements that the affiant is an incumbent judge of the court of appeals, is domiciled within the district, will not attain the age of 70 by the date of election, and is a candidate for election to the office of judge of the court of appeals. (7) In the primary and general November election for 2 or more judgeships of the court of appeals in a judicial district, each of the following categories of candidates must be listed separately on the ballot, consistent with subsection (8): (a) The names of candidates for the judgeship or judgeships for which the incumbent is seeking election. (b) The names of candidates for the judgeship or judgeships for which the incumbent is not seeking election. (c) The names of candidates for a newly created judgeship or judgeships. (8) If the death or disqualification of an incumbent judge triggers the application of section 409d(2), then for the purposes of subsections (2) and (7), that judgeship must be regarded as a judgeship for which the incumbent judge is not seeking election. The application of this subsection includes, but is not limited to, circumstances in which the governor appoints an individual to fill the vacancy and that individual seeks to qualify as a nominee under section 409d(2). Sec. 409c. After the filing of a nominating petition petitions, paying a filing fee, or filing an affidavit of candidacy by or in on behalf of a proposed candidate for the office of judge of the court of appeals, the proposed candidate is not permitted to withdraw unless he or she the candidate serves a written notice of withdrawal on the secretary of state or his or her duly the secretary of state's authorized agent. The notice must be served not later than 3 days after the last day for filing nominating petitions or paying a filing fee if a nominating petition was petitions were filed or a filing fee was paid for the proposed candidate, and not later than 3 days after the last day for filing affidavits of candidacy if an affidavit of candidacy was filed for the proposed candidate. If the third day falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the notice of withdrawal may be served on the secretary of state or his or her duly the secretary of state's authorized agent at any time on or before 4 p.m. , eastern standard time, on the next secular day. Sec. 409d. (1) In each appellate court district the candidates for office of judge of the court of appeals receiving the largest number of votes at any primary election, to a number equal to twice the number of persons individuals to be elected as set forth in the report of the board of state canvassers, based on the returns from the various boards of county canvassers and election precincts, or as determined by the board of state canvassers as the result of a recount, shall must be declared the nominees for the office at the next general November election. The board of state canvassers shall certify the nomination to the county election commissions. (2) If, after the deadline for filing nominating petitions or paying a filing fee under section 409b, there are fewer candidates for nomination or nominees for the office of judge of the court of appeals than there are persons individuals to be elected at the general November election because of the death or disqualification of a candidate more than 65 days before the general November election, then a person, an individual, whether or not an incumbent, may qualify as a nominee for that office at the general November election by filing nominating petitions or paying a filing fee as required by section 409b. However, the filing shall or payment must be made before 4 p.m. on the twenty-first day following after the death or disqualification of the candidate or 4 p.m. on the sixtieth day preceding before the general November election, whichever is earlier, and the minimum number of nominating petition signatures required is 1,000 or 1/2 the minimum number required under section 409b, whichever is less. (3) The secretary of state shall certify the nomination of each person individual who qualifies as a nominee under subsection (2) to the board of election commissioners of each county in the appellate court district for the general November election. Sec. 412. A general nonpartisan primary election shall must be held in every county of this state on the Tuesday succeeding after the first Monday in August prior to before the general election at which judges of the circuit court are elected, at which time the qualified and registered electors may vote for nonpartisan candidates for the office of judge of the circuit court. If, upon the expiration of the time for filing nominating petitions, paying filing fees, or incumbency filing affidavits of candidacy for the primary election of said the judge of the circuit court in any judicial circuit, it shall appear appears that there are not to exceed twice the number of candidates as there are persons individuals to be elected, then the secretary of state shall certify to the county board of election commissioners the name of such the candidate for circuit court judge whose nominating petitions, filing fee, or affidavits have affidavit of candidacy has been properly filed or paid, and such that candidate shall be is the nominee for the judge of the circuit court and shall must be so certified. As to such that office, there shall must not be no a primary election and this office shall must be omitted from the judicial primary ballot. Sec. 413. (1) To obtain the printing of the name of a person an individual as a candidate for nomination for the office of judge of the circuit court upon on the official nonpartisan primary ballots, there must be filed with the secretary of state nominating petitions containing the signatures, addresses, and dates of signing of a number of qualified and registered electors residing in the judicial circuit as determined under section 544f or by the filing of an affidavit of candidacy according to section 413a. The secretary of state shall receive the nominating petitions up to 4 p.m. of the fifteenth Tuesday before the primary. The provisions of sections 544a and 544b apply. In lieu of filing nominating petitions, a candidate for the office of judge of the circuit court may pay a nonrefundable filing fee to the secretary of state in a dollar amount equal to the minimum number of nominating petition signatures required for this office. Payment of the filing fee and certification of the name of the candidate paying the filing fee are governed by the same provisions as in the case of nominating petitions. The filing fee must be deposited in the general fund of this state. (2) If a candidate for nomination for the office of judge of the circuit court receives incorrect or inaccurate written information from the secretary of state or the bureau of elections concerning the number of nominating petition signatures required under section 544f and that incorrect or inaccurate written information is published or distributed by the secretary of state or the bureau of elections, the candidate may bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction for equitable relief. A court may grant equitable relief to a candidate under this subsection if all of the following occur: (a) The candidate brings the action for equitable relief within 6 days after the candidate is notified by the secretary of state or the bureau of elections that the candidate's nominating petition contains insufficient signatures. (b) The candidate files an affidavit certifying that he or she the candidate contacted and received from the secretary of state or the bureau of elections incorrect or inaccurate written information concerning the number of nominating petition signatures required under section 544f. (c) The secretary of state or the bureau of elections published or distributed the incorrect or inaccurate written information concerning the number of nominating petition signatures required under section 544f before the filing deadline under subsection (1). (d) The secretary of state or bureau of elections did not inform the candidate at least 14 days before the filing deadline under subsection (1) that incorrect or inaccurate written information concerning the number of nominating petition signatures required under section 544f had been published or distributed. (3) If a court grants equitable relief to a candidate under subsection (2), the candidate must be given the opportunity to obtain additional nominating petition signatures to meet the requirements under section 544f. The additional nominating petition signatures obtained by a candidate must be filed with the secretary of state no later than 4 p.m. on the fifth business day after the date that the court order granting equitable relief is filed. (4) The nominating petition signatures filed under this section are subject to challenge as provided in section 552. Sec. 414. After the filing of a nominating petition petitions, paying a filing fee, or filing an affidavit of candidacy by or in on behalf of a proposed candidate for the office of judge of the circuit court, the proposed candidate is not permitted to withdraw unless he or she the candidate serves a written notice of withdrawal on the secretary of state or his or her duly the secretary of state's authorized agent. The notice must be served not later than 3 days after the last day for filing nominating petitions or paying a filing fee if a nominating petition was petitions were filed or a filing fee was paid for the proposed candidate, and not later than 3 days after the last day for filing affidavits of candidacy if an affidavit of candidacy was filed for the proposed candidate. If the third day falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the notice of withdrawal may be served on the secretary of state or his or her duly the secretary of state's authorized agent at any time on or before 4 p.m. , eastern standard time, on the next secular day. Sec. 415. (1) The candidates for the office of judge of the circuit court receiving the largest number of votes at any primary election, to a number equal to twice the number of persons individuals to be elected as set forth in the report of the board of state canvassers, based on the returns from the various county boards of canvassers and election precincts or as determined by the board of state canvassers as the result of a recount, shall must be declared the nominees for the office at the next general election. The board of state canvassers shall certify the nomination to the county election commissions. (2) If, after the deadline for filing nominating petitions or paying a filing fee under section 413, there are fewer candidates for nomination or nominees for the office of judge of the circuit court than there are persons individuals to be elected at the general November election because of the death or disqualification of a candidate more than 65 days before the general November election, then a person, an individual, whether or not an incumbent, may qualify as a nominee for that office at the general November election by filing nominating petitions or paying a filing fee as required by section 413. However, the filing shall or payment must be made before 4 p.m. on the twenty-first day following after the death or disqualification of the candidate or 4 p.m. on the sixtieth day preceding the general November election, whichever is earlier, and the minimum number of nominating petition signatures required is 1,000 or 1/2 the minimum number required under section 413, whichever is less. (3) The secretary of state shall certify the nomination of each person individual who qualifies as a nominee under subsection (2) to the board of election commissioners specified by section 687 for the general November election. Sec. 424a. (1) In the primary and general election for 2 or more judgeships of the circuit court, each of the following categories of candidates shall must be listed separately on the ballot, consistent with subsection (3): (a) The names of candidates for the judgeship or judgeships for which the incumbent is seeking election. (b) The names of candidates for an existing judgeship or judgeships for which the incumbent is not seeking election. (c) The names of candidates for a newly created judgeship or judgeships. (2) Nominating petitions filed or filing fees paid under section 413 are valid only if they the candidate clearly indicate indicates for which of the following offices the candidate is filing, consistent with subsection (3): (a) An unspecified existing judgeship for which the incumbent judge is not seeking election. (b) A new judgeship. (c) An unspecified existing judgeship for which the incumbent judge is seeking election. (3) If the death or disqualification of an incumbent judge triggers the application of section 415(2), then for the purposes of subsections (1) and (2), that judgeship shall must be regarded as a judgeship for which the incumbent judge is not seeking election. The application of this subsection includes, but is not limited to, circumstances in which the governor appoints an individual to fill the vacancy and that individual seeks to qualify as a nominee under section 415(2). (4) A person An individual who files nominating petitions or pays a filing fee for election to more than 1 circuit judgeship shall have has not more than 3 days following after the close of filing to withdraw from all but 1 filing. (5) In a primary and general election for 2 or more judgeships where more than 1 of the categories in subsection (2) could be selected, a candidate shall apply to the bureau of elections for a written statement of office designation to correspond to the judgeship sought by the candidate. The office designation provided by the secretary of state shall must be included in the heading of all nominating petitions. Nominating petitions containing an improper office designation are invalid. (6) The secretary of state shall issue an office designation of incumbent position for any judgeship for which the incumbent judge is eligible to seek reelection. If an incumbent judge does not file an affidavit of candidacy by the deadline, the secretary of state shall notify all candidates for that office that a nonincumbent position exists. All nominating petitions circulated for the nonincumbent position subsequent to the deadline shall must bear an office designation of nonincumbent position. All signatures collected prior to before the affidavit of candidacy filing deadline may be filed with the nonincumbent nominating petitions. Sec. 432. A general nonpartisan primary election shall must be held in every county of this state on the Tuesday succeeding after the first Monday in August preceding before every general November election at which judges of probate are to be elected, at which time the qualified and registered electors may vote for nonpartisan candidates for the office of judge of probate. If upon the expiration of the time for filing nominating petitions, paying filing fees, or incumbency filing affidavits of candidacy for the primary election of said the probate judges in any county it shall appear appears that there are not to exceed twice the number of candidates as there are persons individuals to be elected, then the county clerk shall certify to the county board of election commissioners the name of such the candidate for probate judge whose nominating petitions, filing fee, or affidavit of candidacy have been properly filed or paid and such that candidate shall be is the nominee for the judge of probate and shall must be so certified. As to such that office, there shall must not be no a primary election and this office shall must be omitted from the judicial primary ballot. Sec. 433. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, to obtain the printing of the name of a person an individual as a candidate for nomination for the office of judge of probate upon on the official nonpartisan primary ballots, there must be filed with the county clerk of each county nominating petitions containing the signatures, addresses, and dates of signing of a number of qualified and registered electors residing in the county as determined under section 544f or by the filing of an affidavit of candidacy according to section 433a. In the case of a probate court district, to obtain the printing of the name of a person an individual as a candidate for nomination for the office of judge of probate upon on the official nonpartisan primary ballots, there must be filed with the secretary of state nominating petitions containing the signatures, addresses, and dates of signing of a number of qualified and registered electors residing in the probate court district as determined under section 544f or by the filing of an affidavit of candidacy according to section 433a. The county clerk or, in the case of a probate court district, the secretary of state shall receive nominating petitions up to 4 p.m. on the fifteenth Tuesday before the August primary. The provisions of sections 544a and 544b apply. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, in lieu of filing nominating petitions, a candidate for the office of judge of probate may pay a nonrefundable filing fee to the county clerk of that county in a dollar amount equal to the minimum number of nominating petition signatures required for this office. In a probate court district, in lieu of filing nominating petitions, a candidate for the office of judge of probate may pay a nonrefundable filing fee to the secretary of state in a dollar amount equal to the minimum number of nominating petition signatures required for this office. Payment of the filing fee and certification of the name of the candidate paying the filing fee are governed by the same provisions as in the case of nominating petitions. The filing fee paid to the secretary of state must be deposited in the general fund of this state, and the filing fee paid to a county clerk must be deposited in the general fund of that county. (2) Nominating petitions filed or filing fees paid under this section are valid only if they the candidate clearly indicate indicates for which of the following offices the candidate is filing, consistent with section 435a(2): (a) An unspecified existing judgeship for which the incumbent judge is seeking election. (b) An unspecified existing judgeship for which the incumbent judge is not seeking election. (c) A new judgeship. (3) A person An individual who files nominating petitions or pays a filing fee for election to more than 1 probate judgeship has not more than 3 days following after the close of filing to withdraw from all but 1 filing. (4) In a primary and general election for 2 or more judgeships where more than 1 of the categories in subsection (2) could be selected, a candidate shall apply to the bureau of elections for a written statement of office designation to correspond to the judgeship sought by the candidate. The office designation provided by the secretary of state must be included in the heading of all nominating petitions. Nominating petitions containing an improper office designation are invalid. (5) The secretary of state shall issue an office designation of incumbent position for any judgeship for which the incumbent judge is eligible to seek reelection. If an incumbent judge does not file an affidavit of candidacy by the deadline, the secretary of state shall notify all candidates for that office that a nonincumbent position exists. All nominating petitions circulated for the nonincumbent position after the deadline must bear an office designation of nonincumbent position. All signatures collected before the affidavit of candidacy filing deadline may be filed with the nonincumbent nominating petitions. (6) If a candidate for nomination for the office of judge of probate receives incorrect or inaccurate written information from the county clerk or, in the case of a probate court district, the secretary of state concerning the number of nominating petition signatures required under section 544f and that incorrect or inaccurate written information is published or distributed by the county clerk or, in the case of a probate court district, the secretary of state, the candidate may bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction for equitable relief. A court may grant equitable relief to a candidate under this subsection if all of the following occur: (a) The candidate brings the action for equitable relief within 6 days after the candidate is notified by the county clerk or, in the case of a probate court district, the secretary of state that the candidate's nominating petition contains petitions contain insufficient signatures. (b) The candidate files an affidavit certifying that he or she the candidate contacted and received from the county clerk or, in the case of a probate court district, the secretary of state incorrect or inaccurate written information concerning the number of nominating petition signatures required under section 544f. (c) The county clerk or, in the case of a probate court district, the secretary of state published or distributed the incorrect or inaccurate written information concerning the number of nominating petition signatures required under section 544f before the filing deadline under subsection (1). (d) The county clerk or, in the case of a probate court district, the secretary of state did not inform the candidate at least 14 days before the filing deadline under subsection (1) that incorrect or inaccurate written information concerning the number of nominating petition signatures required under section 544f had been published or distributed. (7) If a court grants equitable relief to a candidate under subsection (6), the candidate must be given the opportunity to obtain additional nominating petition signatures to meet the requirements under section 544f. The additional nominating petition signatures obtained by a candidate must be filed with the county clerk or, in the case of a probate court district, the secretary of state no later than 4 p.m. on the fifth business day after the date that the court order granting equitable relief is filed. (8) The nominating petition signatures filed under this section are subject to challenge as provided in section 552. Sec. 434. After the filing of a nominating petition petitions, paying a filing fee, or filing an affidavit of candidacy by or in on behalf of a proposed candidate for the office of judge of probate, the proposed candidate is not permitted to withdraw unless he or she the candidate serves a written notice of withdrawal on the secretary of state or his or her duly the secretary of state's authorized agent. The notice must be served not later than 3 days after the last day for filing nominating petitions or paying a filing fee if a nominating petition was petitions were filed or a filing fee was paid for the proposed candidate, and not later than 3 days after the last day for filing affidavits of candidacy if an affidavit of candidacy was filed for the proposed candidate. If the third day falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the notice of withdrawal may be served on the secretary of state or his or her duly the secretary of state's authorized agent at any time on or before 4 p.m. , eastern standard time, on the next secular day. Sec. 435. (1) The candidates for the office of judge of probate receiving the largest number of votes at any primary election, to a number equal to twice the number of places to be filled as set forth in the report of the board of county canvassers, based on the returns from the various election precincts or as determined by the board of county canvassers as the result of a recount, shall must be declared the nominees for the office at the next November election. The board of county canvassers shall certify the nominations to the county election commission. (2) If, after the deadline for filing nominating petitions or paying a filing fee under section 433, there are fewer candidates for nomination or nominees for the office of judge of probate than there are persons individuals to be elected because of the death or disqualification of a candidate more than 65 days before the general November election, then a person, an individual, whether or not an incumbent, may qualify as a nominee for that office at the general November election by filing nominating petitions or paying a filing fee with the county clerk or, in case of a probate district, with the secretary of state in the manner required by section 433. However, the filing shall or payment must be made before 4 p.m. on the twenty-first day following after the death or disqualification of the candidate or 4 p.m. on the sixtieth day preceding before the general November election, whichever is earlier, and the minimum number of nominating petition signatures required is 1,000 or 1/2 the minimum number required under section 433, whichever is less. (3) The county clerk or, in case of a probate district, the secretary of state shall certify the nomination of each person individual who qualifies as a nominee under subsection (2) to the board of election commissioners specified by section 687 for the general November election. Sec. 467a. A general nonpartisan primary election must be held in every district and election division of this state on the Tuesday after the first Monday in August before the general election at which judges of the district court are elected, at which time the qualified and registered electors may vote for nonpartisan candidates for judge of the district court. If upon the expiration of the time for filing nominating petitions, paying filing fees, or filing affidavits of candidacy for the primary election of the judge of the district court in any district or election division, it appears that there are not to exceed twice the number of candidates as there are persons individuals to be elected, the secretary of state shall certify to the county board of election commissioners the name names of those candidates for district court judge whose nominating petitions, filing fees, or affidavits of candidacy have been properly filed or paid and those candidates are the nominees for the judge of the district court and must be so certified. As to that office, there must not be a primary election and this office must be omitted from the judicial primary ballot. Sec. 467b. (1) To obtain the printing of the name of a person an individual as a candidate for nomination for the office of judge of the district court upon on the official nonpartisan primary ballots, there must be filed with the secretary of state nominating petitions containing the signatures, addresses, and dates of signing of a number of qualified and registered electors residing in the judicial district or division as determined under section 544f. An incumbent district court judge may also become a candidate by the filing of an affidavit of candidacy in lieu of nominating petitions according to section 467c. The secretary of state shall receive nominating petitions up to 4 p.m. on the fifteenth Tuesday before the primary. The provisions of sections 544a and 544b apply. In lieu of filing nominating petitions, a candidate for the office of judge of the district court may pay a nonrefundable filing fee to the secretary of state in a dollar amount equal to the minimum number of nominating petition signatures required for this office. Payment of the filing fee and certification of the name of the candidate paying the filing fee are governed by the same provisions as in the case of nominating petitions. The filing fee must be deposited in the general fund of this state. (2) Nominating petitions filed or filing fees paid under this section are valid only if they the candidate clearly indicate indicates for which of the following offices the candidate is filing, consistent with section 467c(4): (a) An unspecified existing judgeship for which the incumbent judge is seeking election. (b) An unspecified existing judgeship for which the incumbent judge is not seeking election. (c) A new judgeship. (3) A person An individual who files nominating petitions or pays a filing fee for election to more than 1 district judgeship has not more than 3 days following after the close of filing to withdraw from all but 1 filing. (4) In a primary and general election for 2 or more judgeships where more than 1 of the categories in subsection (2) could be selected, a candidate shall apply to the bureau of elections for a written statement of office designation to correspond to the judgeship sought by the candidate. The office designation provided by the secretary of state must be included in the heading of all nominating petitions. Nominating petitions containing an improper office designation are invalid. (5) The secretary of state shall issue an office designation of incumbent position for any judgeship for which the incumbent judge is eligible to seek reelection. If an incumbent judge does not file an affidavit of candidacy by the deadline, the secretary of state shall notify all candidates for that office that a nonincumbent position exists. All nominating petitions circulated for the nonincumbent position after the deadline must bear an office designation of nonincumbent position. All signatures collected before the affidavit of candidacy filing deadline may be filed with the nonincumbent nominating petitions. (6) If a candidate for nomination for the office of judge of the district court receives incorrect or inaccurate written information from the secretary of state or the bureau of elections concerning the number of nominating petition signatures required under section 544f and that incorrect or inaccurate written information is published or distributed by the secretary of state or the bureau of elections, the candidate may bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction for equitable relief. A court may grant equitable relief to a candidate under this subsection if all of the following occur: (a) The candidate brings the action for equitable relief within 6 days after the candidate is notified by the secretary of state or the bureau of elections that the candidate's nominating petition contains petitions contain insufficient signatures. (b) The candidate files an affidavit certifying that he or she the candidate contacted and received from the secretary of state or the bureau of elections incorrect or inaccurate written information concerning the number of nominating petition signatures required under section 544f. (c) The secretary of state or the bureau of elections published or distributed the incorrect or inaccurate written information concerning the number of nominating petition signatures required under section 544f before the filing deadline under subsection (1). (d) The secretary of state or bureau of elections did not inform the candidate at least 14 days before the filing deadline under subsection (1) that incorrect or inaccurate written information concerning the number of nominating petition signatures required under section 544f had been published or distributed. (7) If a court grants equitable relief to a candidate under subsection (6), the candidate must be given the opportunity to obtain additional nominating petition signatures to meet the requirements under section 544f. The additional nominating petition signatures obtained by a candidate must be filed with the secretary of state no later than 4 p.m. on the fifth business day after the date that the court order granting equitable relief is filed. (8) The nominating petition signatures filed under this section are subject to challenge as provided in section 552. Sec. 467d. After the filing of a nominating petition petitions, paying a filing fee, or filing an affidavit of candidacy by or in on behalf of a proposed candidate for the office of judge of the district court, the proposed candidate is not permitted to withdraw unless he or she the candidate serves a written notice of withdrawal on the secretary of state or his or her duly the secretary of state's authorized agent. The notice must be served not later than 3 days after the last day for filing nominating petitions or paying a filing fee if a nominating petition was petitions were filed or a filing fee was paid for the proposed candidate, and not later than 3 days after the last day for filing affidavits of candidacy if an affidavit of candidacy was filed for the proposed candidate. If the third day falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the notice of withdrawal may be served on the secretary of state or his or her duly the secretary of state's authorized agent at any time on or before 4 p.m. , eastern standard time, on the next secular day. Sec. 467e. (1) The candidates for the office of judge of the district court receiving the largest number of votes at any primary election, to a number equal to twice the number of persons individuals to be elected as set forth in the report of the board of state canvassers, based on the returns from the various county boards of canvassers and election precincts or as determined by the board as the result of a recount, shall must be declared the nominees for the office at the next general November election. The board of state canvassers shall certify the nomination to the county election commissions. (2) If, after the deadline for filing nominating petitions or paying a filing fee under section 467b, there are fewer candidates for nomination or nominees for the office of judge of the district court than there are persons individuals to be elected because of the death or disqualification of a candidate more than 65 days before the general November election, then a person, an individual, whether or not an incumbent, may qualify as a nominee for that office at the general November election by filing nominating petitions or paying a filing fee as required by section 467b. However, the filing shall or payment must be made before 4 p.m. on the twenty-first day following after the death or disqualification of the candidate or 4 p.m. on the sixtieth day preceding before the general November election, whichever is earlier, and the minimum number of nominating petition signatures required is 1,000 or 1/2 the minimum number required under section 467b, whichever is less. (3) The secretary of state shall certify the nomination of each person individual who qualifies as a nominee under subsection (2) to the board of election commissioners specified by section 687 for the general November election. Sec. 590. (1) For the purposes of As used in this act, "qualifying petition" means a nominating petition required of and filed by a person an individual to qualify to appear on an election ballot as a candidate for office without political party affiliation. (2) A person An individual may file a qualifying petition for a partisan office or for the office of justice of the supreme court. A filing fee shall not be tendered instead of a qualifying petition.In lieu of filing nominating petitions for a partisan office or for the office of justice of the supreme court, an individual may pay a nonrefundable filing fee to the filing officer in a dollar amount equal to the minimum number of nominating petition signatures required for that office as provided under section 590b. Payment of the filing fee and certification of the name of the candidate paying the filing fee are governed by the same provisions as in the case of nominating petitions. The filing fee must be deposited in the general fund of this state. (3) A person An individual filing a qualifying petition or paying a filing fee shall meet the qualifications prescribed by law to hold the office. Sec. 590b. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) and subject to the requirements prescribed in subsections (3) and (4), a qualifying petition for an office shall must be signed by a number of qualified and registered electors of the district that is represented by the office being sought by the candidate equal to not less than 2% of the total number of votes cast for all candidates for governor in the district at the last election in which a governor was elected. In any case, at least 15 signatures shall be submitted.as determined under section 544f. (2) Subject to the requirements of subsections (3) and (4), if a qualifying petition is for a statewide elective office, the qualifying petition shall must be signed by a number of qualified and registered electors of this state equal to not less than 1% of the total number of votes cast for all candidates for governor at the last election in which a governor was elected.as determined under section 544f. (3) All signatures on a qualifying petition shall must be obtained not more than 180 days immediately before the date of filing under section 590c. (4) As part of the minimum number of required qualifying petition signatures under this section, a qualifying petition for the office of president President of the United States, United States senator, Senator, governor, attorney general, secretary of state, state board of education, board of regents of the university University of Michigan, board of trustees of Michigan state university, State University, board of governors of Wayne state university, State University, or justice of the supreme court shall must be signed by at least 100 registered electors in each of at least 1/2 of the congressional districts of the this state. Sec. 590c. (1) A qualifying petition or filing fee for an office shall must be filed with or paid to the filing officer authorized to receive a partisan nominating petition or a certificate of nomination for that office. (2) A qualifying petition or filing fee for an office elected at the general November election shall must be filed or paid not later than 4 p.m. of the one hundred-tenth day before the general election. A qualifying petition or filing fee for an official elected at an election other than the general November election shall must be filed or paid not later than the deadline established by statute or charter for filing a partisan petition or certificate of nomination for the office or at least 90 days before that election, whichever is later. (3) A candidate who files a qualifying petition shall or pays a filing fee is not be permitted to withdraw his or her from the candidacy unless a written notice of withdrawal is filed with the filing officer who received the qualifying petition or filing fee. The notice shall must be filed not later than 4 p.m. of the third day after the last day for filing a qualifying petition or paying a filing fee. Sec. 590f. (1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3), sections 544c, 545, 552, 553, 555, 556, and 558 are applicable to a qualifying petition or filing fee, a person an individual filing a qualifying petition or paying a filing fee, and an officer receiving a qualifying petition or filing fee. (2) The board of state canvassers shall canvass a qualifying petition filed with the secretary of state and shall make an official declaration of the sufficiency or insufficiency of the qualifying petition at least 60 days before the election. A hearing under this subsection by the board of state canvassers shall must be held as provided in section 552. (3) A filing officer who receives a qualifying petition or filing fee from a candidate who has met the requirements of this act shall certify to the proper board or boards of election commissioners the candidate's name, post office address, and office sought. If the election for the office is held at the general election, the filing officer shall make the certification not later than 60 days before the general election. Sec. 590g. (1) A person An individual who files a qualifying petition or pays a filing fee shall not file a partisan nominating petition or pay a filing fee, and shall not be nominated as a candidate by write-in vote or by a political party convention, caucus, or committee, for an office to be elected at the election for which the person individual has filed a qualifying petition or paid a filing fee or at an election held during the same calendar year as that election. (2) A person An individual who files a qualifying petition or pays a filing fee for more than 1 office, which offices are incompatible and the terms of which offices run concurrently or overlap, shall select the 1 office to which his or her the individual's candidacy is restricted not later than 4 p.m. of the third day after the last day for filing a qualifying petition or paying a filing fee. Failure to make this selection disqualifies the person individual as a candidate for the offices for which qualifying petitions were filed or filing fees were paid, and the qualifying petitions shall must not be canvassed.